Utah statutes.
62A-7-402.   Aiding or concealing youth offender -- Trespass -- Criminal penalties.

(1)  A person who commits any of the following offenses is guilty of a class A misdemeanor:

(a)  entering, or attempting to enter, a building or enclosure appropriated to the use of youth offenders, without permission;

(b)  entering any premises belonging to a secure facility and committing or attempting to commit a trespass or damage on those premises; or

(c)  willfully annoying or disturbing the peace and quiet of a secure facility or of a youth offender in a secure facility.

(2)  A person is guilty of a third degree felony who:

(a)  knowingly harbors or conceals a youth offender who has:

(i)  escaped from a secure facility; or

(ii)  absconded from:

(A)  a facility or supervision; or

(B)  supervision of the Division of Juvenile Justice Services; or

(b)  willfully aided or assisted a youth offender who has been lawfully committed to a secure facility in escaping or attempting to escape from that facility.

(3)  As used in this section:

(a)  a youth offender absconds from a facility when he:

(i)  leaves the facility without permission; or

(ii)  fails to return at a prescribed time.

(b)  A youth offender absconds from supervision when he:

(i)  changes his residence from the residence that he reported to the division as his correct address to another residence, without notifying the Division of Juvenile Justice Services or obtaining permission; or

(ii)  for the purpose of avoiding supervision:

(A)  hides at a different location from his reported residence; or

(B)  leaves his reported residence.

